New York, session 2025-2026, S8345.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2 of chapter 465 of the laws of 2016, amending the 2 tax law relating to authorizing the city of Hudson to impose hotel and 3 motel taxes, as amended by chapter 404 of the laws of 2022, is amended 4 to read as follows: 5 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 6 deemed repealed December 1, [2025] 2027. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13316-01-5